Florida, session 2026, HB571.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (66) of section 320.08058, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
320.08058 Specialty license plates.—
(66) ENDLESS SUMMER LICENSE PLATES.—
(a) The department shall develop an Endless Summer license
plate for display on a motor vehicle and for display on a
motorcycle as provided in this section. Endless Summer license
plates must bear the colors and design approved by the
department. The word "Florida" must appear at the top of the
plate, and the words "Endless Summer" must appear at the bottom
of the plate. Any department-approved image must be placed on
the far left side of a plate for display on a motorcycle.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb571-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 571 2026
(b) The license plate annual use fees shall be distributed
to Surfing's Evolution & Preservation Corporation to fund its
activities, programs, and projects aimed at preserving the sport
of surfing. Surfing's Evolution & Preservation Corporation may
retain all revenue from the annual use fees until all startup
costs for developing and establishing the plate have been
recovered. Thereafter, up to 10 percent of the annual use fee
revenue may be used for promotion and marketing of the specialty
license plate and administrative costs directly associated with
the corporation's programs and the specialty license plate.
Surfing's Evolution & Preservation Corporation shall use the
remaining funds as follows:
1. To fund the proposed Surfing's Evolution & Preservation
Experience project.
2. To provide funds for the provision of lifeguards or the
building of artificial reefs.
3. To provide funds to organizations that house the
history and artifacts of surfing or promote the sport through
exhibits, lectures, and events.
4. To support programs and events of other organizations
that support beaches and oceans and promote education on beach
safety, coastal pollution, and beach ecology.
(c) The number of valid specialty license plates issued
for display on a motor vehicle and for display on a motorcycle
must be added together to determine whether the specialty
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb571-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 571 2026
license plate must be discontinued pursuant to s.
320.08056(8)(a).
Section 2. This act shall take effect October 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb571-00